Utah statutes.
63K-1-102.   Definitions.
(1) (a)  "Absent" means:
(i)  not physically present or not able to be communicated with for 48 hours;
or
(ii)  for local government officers, as defined by local ordinances.
(b)  "Absent" does not include a person who can be communicated with via
telephone, radio, or telecommunications.
(2)  "Attack" means a nuclear, conventional, biological, or chemical warfare
action against the United States of America or this state.
(3)  "Department" means the Department of Administrative Services, the
Department of Agriculture and Food, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission,
the Department of Commerce, the Department of Community and Culture, the
Department of Corrections, the Department of Environmental Quality, the
Department of Financial Institutions, the Department of Health, the Department
of Human Resource Management, the Department of Workforce Services, the Labor
Commission, the National Guard, the Department of Insurance, the Department of
Natural Resources, the Department of Public Safety, the Public Service
Commission, the Department of Human Services, the State Tax Commission, the
Department of Technology Services, the Department of Transportation, any other
major administrative subdivisions of state government, the State Board of
Education, the State Board of Regents, the Utah Housing Corporation, the
Workers' Compensation Fund, the State Retirement Board, and each institution
of higher education within the system of higher education.
(4)  "Disaster" means a situation causing, or threatening to cause, widespread
damage, social disruption, or injury or loss of life or property resulting
from attack, internal disturbance, natural phenomenon, or technological
hazard.
(5)  "Division" means the Division of Homeland Security established in Title
53, Chapter 2, Part 1, Homeland Security Act.
(6)  "Emergency interim successor" means a person designated by this chapter
to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of an office when the person
legally exercising the powers and duties of the office is unavailable.
(7)  "Executive director" means the person with ultimate responsibility for
managing and overseeing the operations of each department, however
denominated.
(8)  "Internal disturbance" means a riot, prison break, disruptive terrorism,
or strike.
(9)  "Natural phenomenon" means any earthquake, tornado, storm, flood,
landslide, avalanche, forest or range fire, drought, epidemic, or other
catastrophic event.
(10) (a)  "Office" includes all state and local offices, the powers and duties
of which are defined by constitution, statutes, charters, optional plans,
ordinances, articles, or by-laws.
(b)  "Office" does not include the office of governor or the legislative or
judicial offices.
(11)  "Place of governance" means the physical location where the powers of an
office are being exercised.
(12)  "Political subdivision" includes counties, cities, towns, townships,
districts, authorities, and other public corporations and entities whether
organized and existing under charter or general law.
(13)  "Political subdivision officer" means a person holding an office in a
political subdivision.
(14)  "State officer" means the attorney general, the state treasurer, the
state auditor, and the executive director of each department.
(15)  "Technological hazard" means any hazardous materials accident, mine
accident, train derailment, air crash, radiation incident, pollution,
structural fire, or explosion.
(16)  "Unavailable" means:
(a)  absent from the place of governance during a disaster that seriously
disrupts normal governmental operations, whether or not that absence or
inability would give rise to a vacancy under existing constitutional or
statutory provisions; or
(b)  as otherwise defined by local ordinance.
